Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1405
Natural resources district; cost-sharing program; qualification for funding.

Any natural resources district cost-sharing program for decommissioning illegal water wells may qualify for funding pursuant to section 46-1404 if the program:

(1) Applies only to water wells properly decommissioned by licensed water well contractors and pump installation contractors;

(2) Applies to all water wells in the district;

(3) Is available for at least thirty water wells per year; and

(4) Provides at least sixty percent of the costs of decommissioning, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars for all water wells other than hand-dug water wells which shall be eligible for up to a maximum of seven hundred dollars.

A natural resources district may establish maximum cost-share assistance amounts that will be provided to landowners for decommissioning water wells based on well depths and diameters to insure that landowners will be compensated for at least sixty percent of the cost of water well decommissioning.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 871, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 508, § 10.